Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.030

Arraignment continued—Treatment referral. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The arraigning judge upon consideration of the petition may continue the arraignment and refer such person for a diagnostic investigation and evaluation to:

(1) An approved substance use disorder treatment program as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW if the petition alleges a substance use disorder;

(2) An approved mental health center if the petition alleges a mental problem;

(3) The department of social and health services if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2); or

(4) An approved state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to RCW 43.20A.735 if the petition alleges a domestic violence behavior problem.

[ 2023 c 102 s 17; 2021 c 215 s 116; 2019 c 263 s 704; 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 526; 2002 c 219 s 8; 1999 c 143 s 42; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Effective date—2019 c 263 ss 501-504, 601, 602, and 701-708: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.

PDFRCW 10.05.030

Arraignment continued—Treatment referral. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The arraigning judge upon consideration of the petition may continue the arraignment and refer such person for a diagnostic investigation and evaluation to:

(1) A state-approved behavioral health agency, approved for substance use disorder services, as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW if the petition alleges a substance use disorder;

(2) A state-approved behavioral health agency, approved for mental health services, as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW, if the petition alleges a mental health disorder;

(3) The department of children, youth, and families if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2); or

(4) An approved state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to RCW 43.20A.735 if the petition alleges a domestic violence behavior problem.

[ 2024 c 306 s 14; 2023 c 102 s 17; 2021 c 215 s 116; 2019 c 263 s 704; 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 526; 2002 c 219 s 8; 1999 c 143 s 42; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 306: See note following RCW 9.94A.661.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Effective date—2019 c 263 ss 501-504, 601, 602, and 701-708: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.